en: Floor Protection Films & Runners
xx: Floor Protection Films & Runners
cs: Ochranné fólie a papíry na podlahu
da: Løbere og beskyttelsesfilm til gulv
de: Fußbodenschutzfolien & -läufer
es: Láminas y franjas protectoras para suelos
fr: Films de protection pour sols
it: Pellicole e passatoie di protezione per pavimenti
ja: 床養生シート
nl: Beschermfolie en -lopers voor vloeren
no: Løpere og beskyttelsesfilm til gulv
pl: Tymczasowe zabezpieczenia podłóg
pt: Películas protetoras de pisos e passadeiras
ru: Пленки и материалы для защиты полов
sv: Golvskyddsplast och gångmattor
tr: Zemin Koruma Filmleri ve Yollukları

en: Furniture Floor Protectors
xx: Furniture Floor Protectors
cs: Ochranné podložky pod nábytek
da: Filtpuder til møbler
de: Möbelgleiter
es: Protectores del suelo para mobiliario
fr: Patins et embouts pour piètements de meubles
it: Protezioni per mobili per pavimento
ja: 家具用キズ防止グッズ
nl: Meubelglijders
no: Gulvbeskyttelse for møbler
pl: Podkładki ochronne pod meble
pt: Feltro protetor de piso
ru: Подкладки под мебель
sv: Golvskydd till möbler
tr: Mobilyalar için Zemin Koruyucular

en: Garage Floor Mats
xx: Garage Floor Mats
cs: Podlahové krytiny do garáže
da: Måtter til garager
de: Garagenmatten
es: Alfombras para suelos de garajes
fr: Revêtements de sol de garage
it: Rivestimenti per pavimenti di garage
ja: ガレージ用フロアマット
nl: Garagematten
no: Gulvmatter til garasje
pl: Maty garażowe
pt: Tapetes para garagem
ru: Коврики для гаражей
sv: Garagegolvsmattor
tr: Garaj Zemin Döşemeleri

en: Garbage Bags
xx: Garbage Bags
cs: Pytle na odpadky
da: Skraldeposer
de: Müllbeutel
es: Bolsas de basura
fr: Sacs poubelle
it: Sacchetti spazzatura
ja: ゴミ袋
nl: Vuilniszakken
no: Søppelposer
pl: Worki na śmieci
pt: Sacos de lixo
ru: Мешки для мусора
sv: Soppåsar
tr: Çöp Poşetleri

en: Household Cleaning Supplies
xx: Household Cleaning Supplies
cs: Čisticí potřeby pro domácnost
da: Rengøringsmidler
de: Reinigungsutensilien
es: Productos de limpieza para el hogar
fr: Nettoyage maison
it: Articoli pulizia casa
ja: 掃除用品
nl: Schoonmaakmiddelen voor het huishouden
no: Rengjøringsutstyr
pl: Artykuły domowe do sprzątania
pt: Materiais para limpeza doméstica
ru: Бытовой инвентарь и средства для уборки
sv: Rengöringsutrustning för hushåll
tr: Ev Temizlik Malzemeleri

en: Broom & Mop Handles
xx: Broom & Mop Handles
cs: Násady na smetáky a mopy
da: Koste- og moppeskafter
de: Besen- & Bodenwischerstiele
es: Mangos para escobas y fregonas
fr: Manches à balais et à serpillères
it: Scope e bastoni spazzoloni
ja: ほうき・モップの柄
nl: Bezem- en zwabberstelen
no: Kost- og mopphåndtak
pl: Kije do szczotek i mopów
pt: Cabos de vassoura e esfregão
ru: Рукоятки для мётел и швабр
sv: Skaft till sopborstar och moppar
tr: Süpürge ve Mop Sapları

en: Broom Heads
xx: Broom Heads
cs: Hlavice smetáku
da: Kostehoveder
de: Besenköpfe
es: Cepillos para escobas
fr: Brosses de balais
it: Spazzole per scope
ja: ほうき用スペアヘッド
nl: Bezemkoppen
no: Kostehoder
pl: Szczotki mioteł
pt: Cabeças de vassoura
ru: Насадки мётел
sv: Sopborsthuvuden
tr: Süpürge Başlıkları

en: Brooms
xx: Brooms
cs: Košťata
da: Koste
de: Besen
es: Escobas
fr: Balais
it: Scope
ja: ほうき
nl: Bezems
no: Koster
pl: Miotły
pt: Vassouras
ru: Мётлы
sv: Sopborstar
tr: Süpürgeler

en: Buckets
xx: Buckets
cs: Kbelíky
da: Spande
de: Eimer
es: Cubos o baldes
fr: Seaux
it: Secchi
ja: バケツ
nl: Emmers
no: Bøtter
pl: Wiadra
pt: Baldes
ru: Вёдра
sv: Hinkar
tr: Kovalar

en: Carpet Sweepers
xx: Carpet Sweepers
cs: Mechanické smetáky
da: Tæppekoste
de: Teppichkehrer
es: Aspiradoras manuales
fr: Balais à moquette
it: Spazzatrici tappeti
ja: カーペットスイーパー
nl: Vegers
no: Teppefeiere
pl: Szczotki do dywanów
pt: Varredores de carpetes
ru: Щётки для чистки ковров
sv: Mattsopare
tr: Halı Süpürgeleri

en: Cleaning Gloves
xx: Cleaning Gloves
cs: Čisticí rukavice
da: Gummihandsker
de: Reinigungshandschuhe
es: Guantes de limpieza
fr: Gants de ménage
it: Guanti per pulizie
ja: 掃除用手袋
nl: Schoonmaakhandschoenen
no: Rengjøringshansker
pl: Rękawiczki do sprzątania
pt: Luvas de limpeza
ru: Перчатки для уборки
sv: Rengöringshandskar
tr: Temizlik Eldivenleri

en: Duster Refills
xx: Duster Refills
cs: Náhradní prachovky
da: Støvekost – klude
de: Staubwedel-Ersatzköpfe
es: Recambios para plumeros
fr: Recharges pour plumeau
it: Ricariche per piumini spolveratutto
ja: ダスター取替シート
nl: Navullingen voor stoffers
no: Støvkosthoder
pl: Końcówki do miotełek do kurzu
pt: Refis para espanadores
ru: Запасные щётки для инструментов для уборки пыли
sv: Refills till dammborstar
tr: Toz Bezi Refilleri

en: Dusters
xx: Dusters
cs: Prachovky
da: Støvekoste
de: Staubwedel & -Tücher
es: Plumeros
fr: Plumeaux
it: Spolverini
ja: ダスター
nl: Stoffers
no: Støvkoster
pl: Miotełki do kurzu
pt: Espanadores
ru: Салфетки для вытирания пыли
sv: Dammborstar
tr: Toz Bezleri

en: Dustpans
xx: Dustpans
cs: Lopatky na smetí
da: Fejebakker
de: Kehrschaufeln
es: Recogedores
fr: Pelles à ordures
it: Panni per la polvere
ja: ちりとり
nl: Stoffer en blik
no: Feiebrett
pl: Szufelki
pt: Pás de lixo
ru: Совки для мусора
sv: Sopskyfflar
tr: Faraşlar

en: Fabric & Upholstery Protectors
xx: Fabric & Upholstery Protectors
cs: Ochranné prostředky na textil a čalounění
da: Beskyttelse til stof og møbelbetræk
de: Gewebe- & Polsterschutz
es: Protectores para tejidos y tapizados
fr: Produits de protection des textiles et tissus d'ameublement
it: Protettori per tessuti e tappezzerie
ja: 布製品用防水・防汚スプレー
nl: Beschermers voor stoffen en bekleding
no: Stoff- og trekkbeskyttere
pl: Środki ochronne do materiałów i tapicerki
pt: Protetores de tecidos e forros
ru: Средства для защиты ткани и обивки
sv: Skydd för tyg och möbelstoppningar
tr: Kumaş ve Döşeme Koruyucular

en: Household Cleaning Products
xx: Household Cleaning Products
cs: Čisticí produkty pro domácnost
da: Rengøringsartikler
de: Haushaltsreiniger
es: Productos para limpieza del hogar
fr: Produits de nettoyage pour la maison
it: Prodotti pulizia casa
ja: 家庭用洗剤
nl: Schoonmaakmiddelen voor in huis
no: Rengjøringsprodukter
pl: Środki czyszczące do gospodarstwa domowego
pt: Produtos para limpeza doméstica
ru: Бытовые моющие средства
sv: Rengöringsprodukter för hemmet
tr: Ev Temizlik Ürünleri

en: All-Purpose Cleaners
xx: All-Purpose Cleaners
cs: Univerzální čisticí prostředky
da: Universalrengøring
de: Allzweckreiniger
es: Limpiadores multiusos
fr: Produits nettoyants multi-usages
it: Prodotti di pulizia multiuso
ja: 万能洗剤
nl: Allesreinigers
no: Universale rengjøringsmidler
pl: Uniwersalne środki czyszczące
pt: Para todos os tipos de limpeza
ru: Универсальные чистящие средства
sv: Universalrengöringsmedel
tr: Çok Amaçlı Temizleyiciler

en: Carpet Cleaners
xx: Carpet Cleaners
cs: Čisticí prostředky na koberce
da: Tæpperengøring
de: Teppichreiniger
es: Productos de limpieza para alfombras
fr: Shampouineuses pour moquette
it: Detergenti tappeti
ja: カーペット用洗剤
nl: Vloerbedekkingsreinigers
no: Tepperens
pl: Środki czyszczące do dywanów
pt: Limpadores de carpete
ru: Средства для чистки ковров
sv: Mattrengöring
tr: Halı Temizleyiciler

en: Descalers & Decalcifiers
xx: Descalers & Decalcifiers
cs: Odstraňovače vodního kamene
da: Kalkfjernere
de: Entkalkungsmittel
es: Desincrustadores y descalcificadores
fr: Détartrants et décalcificateurs
it: Disincrostatori e decalcificatori
ja: 湯垢落とし、除石灰剤
nl: Waterontharders en ontkalkingsmiddelen
no: Avflakings- og kalkfjerningsmidler
pl: Odkamieniacze i odwapniacze
pt: Produtos de limpeza desincrustantes e descalcificadores
ru: Средства для удаления налета
sv: Avkalkning och kalkborttagningsmedel
tr: Tufal ve Kireç Gidericiler

en: Dish Detergent & Soap
xx: Dish Detergent & Soap
cs: Prostředky na mytí nádobí
da: Opvaskemiddel
de: Geschirrspülmittel & -seifen
es: Lavaplatos
fr: Savon et détergent à vaisselle
it: Detersivo e sapone piatti
ja: 食器用洗剤
nl: Afwasmiddel en zeep
no: Oppvaskmidler og såpe
pl: Płyny do mycia naczyń i mydła
pt: Sabão e detergente para louças
ru: Средства для мытья посуды
sv: Tvål och diskmedel
tr: Bulaşık Deterjan ve Sabunları